North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 3C. Office of Juvenile Justice. [Repealed]

§§ 147-33.30 through 147-33.71.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-137, s. 1(a), effective July 20, 2000.

Cross References.

For the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see

G.S. 143B-800

et seq.

§ 147-33.72.

Reserved for future codification purposes.